Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.221

Hearing—Conduct.

A hearing shall be held by the director, or the director's duly authorized representative, in the county of the residence of the claimant at a time and place designated by the director. Such hearing shall be de novo and shall conform to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. The disability board and the department shall be entitled to appear in all such proceedings and introduce testimony in support of the decision. Judicial review of any final decision by the director shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW as now law or hereafter amended.

[ 1984 c 184 s 17; 1981 c 294 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 20. Formerly RCW 41.26.054, 41.26.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.